src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-msc-os_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../generator-gt-norm.hfstol
    Morph: ../../analyser-gt-norm.hfstol
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - fooros : #  o-stem
    fooros+N+Msc+Sg+Nom: fooros
    fooros+N+Msc+Sg+Obl: fooros
    fooros+N+Msc+Sg+Dat: fooroske
    fooros+N+Msc+Sg+Abl: foorosta
    fooros+N+Msc+Sg+Ins: fooroha
    fooros+N+Msc+Sg+Gen: foorosko
    fooros+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Kiiro: [fooroskiiro, fooroskiiri, fooroskiire]
    fooros+N+Msc+Pl+Nom: foori
    fooros+N+Msc+Pl+Obl: fooren
    fooros+N+Msc+Pl+Dat: foorenge
    fooros+N+Msc+Pl+Abl: foorenna
    fooros+N+Msc+Pl+Ins: foorensa
    fooros+N+Msc+Pl+Gen: foorengo
    fooros+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Kiiro: [foorengiiro, foorengiire, foorengiire]
